Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2612.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 138 of the general laws is hereby updated in section 12½ by striking subsection
(b) in its entirety and replacing it with the following new subsection:-
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, an establishment licensed
to sell all alcoholic beverages, distilled spirits, cordials or liqueurs for on-premises consumption
may sell beer, malt beverages, wine, and mixed drinks for off-premises consumption subject to
all of the following conditions: (i) the beer, malt beverage, wine, or mixed drink shall not be sold
to a person under 21 years of age; (ii) any delivery of beer, malt beverages, wine, or mixed
drinks for off premises consumption shall not be made without verification that the person
receiving the order has attained 21 years of age; (iii) the mixed drink shall be sold in a sealed
container; (iv) the beer, malt beverage, wine, or mixed drink shall be sold as part of the same
transaction as the purchase of food, and any order that includes a beer, malt beverage, wine, or
mixed drink shall be placed not later than the hour of which the establishment is licensed to sell
of 2

alcohol or 12:00 A.M., whichever time is earlier; provided, that a transaction shall include at
least 1 item of food prepared on-site sufficient to serve 1 individual; (v) a customer shall be
limited to 64 fluid ounces of mixed drinks per transaction consistent with clause (iv); and (vi) if
the mixed drink in a sealed container is to be transported by a motor vehicle, either by delivery
or pick-up, the driver of the motor vehicle shall transport the mixed drink in the trunk of the
motor vehicle or an area that is not considered the passenger area, as defined by section 24I of
chapter 90.
of 2